Hawaii statutes.
§328-97 Posting requirements. Every
pharmacy shall prominently display, in clear and unobstructed public view, a
sign in block letters that shall read:

"HAWAII LAW REQUIRES THAT LESS EXPENSIVE
GENERICALLY EQUIVALENT DRUG PRODUCTS AND INTERCHANGEABLE BIOLOGICAL PRODUCTS BE
OFFERED TO THE CONSUMER. CONSULT YOUR PHYSICIAN AND PHARMACIST CONCERNING THE
AVAILABILITY OF THE LEAST EXPENSIVE DRUG PRODUCT FOR YOUR USE."

The letters must be at least one inch in height. [L
1980, c 187, pt of §1; am L 2016, c 242, §7]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next